Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.180

Sick leave payments—Inclusion in reports to retirement system—Compensation for unused sick leave.

Payments to employees pursuant to RCW 41.48.120 or 41.48.160 shall be included in compensation reported to the appropriate retirement system. Any compensation for unused sick leave shall not be considered payment on account of sickness and shall not be paid from the sick leave account.

[ 1979 c 152 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 152: See note following RCW 41.48.120.